dev/testp.dix
    <pardef n="um__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umat</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umatsa</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umat-sa</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umat-seo</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umat-sin</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umam</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umamsa</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umam-sa</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umam-seo</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umam-sin</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umaibh</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umaibhse</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umaibh-se</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umaibh-seo</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umaibh-sin</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umainn</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umainne</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umpu</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umpusan</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umpu-san</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umpu-seo</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>umpu-sin</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uime</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uimesean</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uime-sean</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uime-seo</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uime-sin</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uimpi</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uimpise</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uimpi-se</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uimpi-seo</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uimpi-sin</l><r>um<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>um</l><r><a/>um<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>um</l><r>um<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="um" a="irishfst"><i/><par n="um__pr"/></e>
